Arkansas, session 2025, HB1619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-408. Administrative fees for immunizations and monoclonal
antibodies for respiratory syncytial virus disease — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "respiratory syncytial virus disease"
means a respiratory infection of the nose, throat, and lungs caused by the
respiratory syncytial virus.
(b) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse an administration
fee that is equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the maximum administration
fee of the Vaccines for Children Program for this state for administration of
*JMB177*
02/27/2025 11:04:58 AM JMB177

HB1619
an immunization or monoclonal antibody used for long-lasting protection from
respiratory syncytial virus disease in infants and toddlers, regardless of
the category in which the beneficiary receiving the immunization or
monoclonal antibody is enrolled, including without limitation the Medicaid
Provider-Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq.
(c) This section does not require a hospital licensed under § 20-9-213
to provide any new or additional service related to administering the
immunization or monoclonal antibody used for long-lasting protection from
respiratory syncytial virus disease in infants and toddlers.
(d) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 114, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-114-214. Immunity related to administration of immunization or
monoclonal antibody used for long-lasting protection from respiratory
syncytial virus disease — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "respiratory syncytial virus disease"
means a respiratory infection of the nose, throat, and lungs caused by the
respiratory syncytial virus.
(b)(1) A person or entity that prescribes, dispenses, administers, or
is otherwise involved in the administration of an immunization or monoclonal
antibody used for long-lasting protection from respiratory syncytial virus
disease in infants and toddlers to an eligible patient is immune from civil
liability.
(2) A person or entity is not immune from civil liability for
actions taken during the administration of an immunization or monoclonal
antibody that:
(A) Are grossly negligent, reckless, or willful; or
(B) Are not taken in good faith and with reasonable care.





02/27/2025 11:04:58 AM JMB177